Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 18.106.270 and 2020 c 153 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person found to have committed an infraction under RCW 18.106.020 shall be assessed a minimum monetary penalty of ((one hundred dollars))$100 for the first infraction. A contractor found to have committed an infraction under RCW 18.106.020 must be assessed a minimum monetary penalty of ((five hundred dollars))$500 for the first infraction. The maximum penalty for an infraction under RCW 18.106.020 must not exceed ((five thousand dollars))$5,000 for a second or subsequent infraction. The department shall set by rule a schedule of penalties for infractions imposed under this chapter.(2) The administrative law judge may not waive, reduce, or suspend the monetary penalty imposed for the infraction.(3) The director may waive or reduce collection of payment for good cause.(4) Any individual or plumbing contractor who ((acquires three infractions))is determined by final order to have committed five or more infractions within a ((thirty-six month))five-year period may have his or her certificate, license, endorsement, or registration suspended for a period of up to two years ((upon recommendation of the advisory board of plumbers))by the department. The order suspending the certificate, license, endorsement, or registration must set forth each of the infractions that form the basis of the suspension. The suspension must be measured from the date of the department's final order. For purposes of this subsection, multiple infractions or violations created by a single inspection or audit are counted as one ((violation))infraction. The department must provide regular updates on enforcement actions under this section to the advisory board of plumbers.(5) Monetary penalties collected under this chapter shall be deposited in the plumbing certificate fund.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2027.--- END ---